Alaska, session 34, SB64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 10 * Section 1. AS 15.05.020 is amended to read: 11 Sec. 15.05.020. Rules for determining residence of voter. For the purpose of 12 determining residence for voting, the place of residence is governed by the following 01 rules: 02 (1) A person may not be considered to have gained a residence solely 03 by reason of presence nor may a person lose it solely by reason of absence while in the 04 civil or military service of this state or of the United States or of absence because of 05 marriage to a person engaged in the civil or military service of this state or the United 06 States, while a student at an institution of learning, while in an institution or asylum at 07 public expense, while confined in public prison, while engaged in the navigation of 08 waters of this state or the United States or of the high seas, while residing on [UPON] 09 an Indian or military reservation, or while residing in the Alaska Pioneers' Home or 10 the Alaska Veterans' Home. 11 (2) The residence of a person is that place in which the person's 12 physical habitation is fixed, and to which, whenever absent, the person has an 13 articulable and reasonable plan [THE INTENTION] to return. If a person resides in 14 one place, but does business in another, the former is the person's place of residence. 15 Temporary work sites do not constitute a dwelling place. 16 (3) [A CHANGE OF RESIDENCE IS MADE ONLY BY THE ACT 17 OF REMOVAL JOINED WITH THE INTENT TO REMAIN IN ANOTHER 18 PLACE.] There can only be one residence. 19 (4) A person does not lose residence if the person leaves home and 20 goes to another country, state, or place in this state for temporary purposes only and 21 with the intent of returning to the person's physical habitation. 22 (5) A person does not gain residence in any place to which the person 23 comes without the present intention to establish a physical habitation 24 [PERMANENT DWELLING] at that place indefinitely. 25 (6) A person loses residence in this state if the person establishes 26 residence in another state or votes in another state's election, either in person or by 27 absentee ballot, and will not be eligible to vote in this state until again qualifying 28 under AS 15.05.010. 29 (7) The term of residence is computed by including the day on which 30 the person's residence begins and excluding the day of election. 31 (8) The address of a voter as it appears on the official voter registration 01 record is presumptive evidence of the person's voting residence. This presumption is 02 negated [ONLY] if the voter notifies the director in writing of a change of voting 03 residence. When a voter's qualification is questioned under AS 15.15.210 or 04 challenged in accordance with the procedure adopted in regulation under 05 AS 15.20.215, the presumption may be rebutted by providing evidence to the 06 division that the voter has established residence in another country, state, or 07 place in this state or evidence that the voter is not a resident under (2) - (7) of this 08 section. 09 * Sec. 2. AS 15.07.060(c) is amended to read: 10 (c) Each applicant who requests registration in person before a registration 11 official shall exhibit one form of identification to the official, including a driver's 12 license, state identification card, current and valid photo identification, birth 13 certificate, passport, or identification card issued by a federally recognized tribe 14 [HUNTING OR FISHING LICENSE]. A registration official who knows the identity 15 of the applicant may waive the identification requirement. 16 * Sec. 3. AS 15.07.060(e) is amended to read: 17 (e) For an applicant requesting initial registration by mail, by facsimile or 18 other electronic transmission approved by the director under AS 15.07.050, or by 19 completing a permanent fund dividend application, the director shall verify the 20 information provided in compliance with (a)(2) and (3) of this section through state 21 agency records described in AS 15.07.055(e). If the applicant cannot comply with the 22 requirement of (a)(2) of this section because the applicant has not been issued any of 23 the listed numbers, the applicant may instead submit a copy of one of the following 24 forms of identification: a driver's license, state identification card, current and valid 25 photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or identification card issued by a 26 federally recognized tribe [HUNTING OR FISHING LICENSE]. 27 * Sec. 4. AS 15.07.070 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 28 (n) The division may use information provided by the Department of Revenue 29 under AS 43.23.015 and 43.23.101 only to register a voter and conduct voter roll 30 maintenance. The division may not disclose personally identifiable information 31 obtained from the Department of Revenue. 01 (o) The division, in cooperation with the Department of Revenue, shall submit 02 an annual report to the governor and to the senate secretary and chief clerk of the 03 house of representatives on or before the first day of each regular session of the 04 legislature and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report shall detail 05 (1) the number of permanent fund dividend applicant records shared 06 with the division; 07 (2) the effect that shared permanent fund dividend applications had on 08 voter roll maintenance under (n) of this section and on election integrity; and 09 (3) security measures taken to protect voter information. 10 (p) In this section, "voter roll maintenance" includes confirming the residency 11 of a registered voter, identifying duplicate registrations, detecting voters who have 12 moved, and detecting voters who are ineligible to vote under AS 15.05. 13 * Sec. 5. AS 15.07.130(a) is amended to read: 14 (a) Periodically, at times of the director's choosing, but not [NO] less 15 frequently than in January of each calendar year, the director shall examine the master 16 register maintained under AS 15.07.120 and shall send, by forwardable 17 [NONFORWARDABLE] mail to the voter's registration mailing address, and to the 18 voter's electronic mail address, if available, a notice requesting address 19 confirmation or correction. The notice must explain that the voter's registration 20 will be inactivated unless the voter responds to the notice within 45 days after the 21 date the notice is sent. The director shall send the notice to each voter 22 (1) whose mail from the division has been returned to the division in 23 the two years immediately preceding the examination of the register; 24 (2) who has not contacted the division in the two years immediately 25 preceding the examination of the register and [; OR (3)] who has not voted or 26 appeared to vote in the 28 months [TWO GENERAL ELECTIONS] immediately 27 preceding the examination of the register; 28 (3) who the division has learned, after registering to vote in this 29 state and during the 28 months immediately preceding the examination of the 30 register, has 31 (A) registered to vote in another state; 01 (B) received a driver's license from another state; 02 (C) registered a vehicle in another state; 03 (D) received public assistance from another state; 04 (E) served on a jury in another state; 05 (F) obtained a resident hunting or fishing license in another 06 state; 07 (G) enrolled in and paid the state resident tuition rate for a 08 public university in another state; 09 (H) received a homestead or residential property tax 10 exemption in another state; or 11 (I) received a benefit available only to residents of another 12 state; or 13 (4) who, for the full duration of the two years immediately 14 preceding the examination of the register, has maintained a physical mailing 15 address located outside the state, unless the division reasonably determines that 16 the person is away from the state for a reason permissible under AS 15.05.020 or 17 another state or federal law related to voting in elections; a notice sent under this 18 paragraph must include a requirement that the voter respond by selecting from a 19 list and certifying the truth of the voter's answer under penalty of perjury one of 20 the following circumstances: 21 (A) the voter is absent from the state but has an articulable 22 and reasonable plan to return to the place of physical habitation on the 23 voter's registration; 24 (B) the voter is absent from the state solely because of a 25 reason listed in AS 15.05.020(1); 26 (C) the voter is no longer a resident of the state and 27 requests to have the voter's registration canceled; or 28 (D) the voter has returned to the state. 29 * Sec. 6. AS 15.07.130(b) is amended to read: 30 (b) If a registered voter does [HAS] not respond to a notice sent under (a) of 31 this section within 45 days after the date the notice is sent, the director shall 01 inactivate the voter's registration [, WITHIN THE PRECEDING FOUR 02 CALENDAR YEARS, CONTACTED THE DIVISION AND HAS NEITHER 03 VOTED NOR APPEARED TO VOTE IN A LOCAL, REGIONAL SCHOOL 04 BOARD, PRIMARY, SPECIAL, OR GENERAL ELECTION DURING THE LAST 05 FOUR CALENDAR YEARS AND A NOTICE SENT TO THE VOTER UNDER (a) 06 OF THIS SECTION WAS RETURNED AS UNDELIVERABLE, THE VOTER 07 SHALL BE ADVISED BY A NOTICE SENT BY FORWARDABLE MAIL TO THE 08 VOTER'S LAST KNOWN ADDRESS THAT REGISTRATION WILL BE 09 INACTIVATED UNLESS THE VOTER RESPONDS TO THE NOTICE NO 10 LATER THAN 45 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF THE NOTICE SENT UNDER 11 THIS SECTION]. The director shall maintain on the master register the name of a 12 voter whose registration is inactivated. The director shall cancel a voter's inactive 13 registration in accordance with the procedures set out in 52 U.S.C. 20507 [42 U.S.C. 14 1973gg-6 (SEC. 8, NATIONAL VOTER REGISTRATION ACT OF 1993)] after the 15 second general election that occurs after the registration becomes inactive if the voter 16 does not contact the division or vote or appear to vote. 17 * Sec. 7. AS 15.07.130(d) is amended to read: 18 (d) The notice sent under (a) [(b)] of this section must include a postage 19 prepaid and pre-addressed return card on which the voter may state the voter's current 20 address. The notice must indicate 21 (1) that the voter should return the card not later than 45 days after the 22 date of the notice if the voter did not change residence; 23 (2) that failure to return the card by the 45-day deadline could result in 24 removal of the voter's name from the official registration list for a subsequent election; 25 (3) that the voter's registration will be cancelled if the voter does not 26 contact the division during, or vote or appear to vote in an election held during, the 27 period beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the last day of 28 the fourth calendar year that occurs after the date of notice; and 29 (4) how the voter can continue to be eligible to vote if the voter has 30 changed residence. 31 * Sec. 8. AS 15.07.130(f) is amended to read: 01 (f) For the purpose of this section, a voter "contacts" the division if the voter 02 notifies the division of a change of address, responds to a notice sent under this 03 section, signs a petition for a ballot measure, requests a new voter registration card, or 04 otherwise communicates with the division other than to vote or register to vote. An 05 individual does not "contact" the division by registering to vote under 06 AS 15.07.070(i) - (m). 07 * Sec. 9. AS 15.07.130 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 08 (g) The division shall adopt regulations to review voter registration records 09 and update the master register. The regulations must include reviews for deceased 10 voters, persons convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude, persons not qualified 11 to vote under AS 15.05, persons registered to vote in another state, whether the 12 number of registered voters on the master register exceeds the number of eligible 13 voters in the state, and voter registration information data breaches. In conducting 14 these reviews, the division shall gather and examine available data from other states 15 and information from the United States Postal Service forwarding databases, motor 16 vehicle records, Department of Corrections records, property and sales tax records, 17 United States Social Security Administration databases, jury duty records, National 18 Change of Address records, and similar records. The division shall also review 19 evidence that a person has undertaken the following activities in another state: 20 (1) registered to vote; 21 (2) obtained a driver's license; 22 (3) registered a vehicle; 23 (4) received public assistance; or 24 (5) obtained a resident hunting or fishing license. 25 (h) The division shall, in consultation with an external, nationally recognized 26 subject-matter expert selected by the division, annually audit the master register. The 27 division shall consider the subject-matter expert's recommendations. By February 1 of 28 each year, the division shall publish a report describing the most recent audit and 29 accounting for the criteria reviewed under (g) of this section. The report must include 30 the expert's recommendations, identify protocols used under (g) of this section, 31 provide election information including the number of voters on the master register and 01 the total population eligible to vote, and highlight voting data problems, irregularities, 02 errors, and vulnerabilities identified in the audit. The division shall submit the report 03 to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the 04 legislature that the report is available on or before the date the report is published. 05 (i) If the director is required under both (a)(4) of this section and (a)(1), (2), or 06 (3) of this section to send a notice to a voter, the director shall send the notice to the 07 voter under (a)(1), (2), or (3) of this section and may not send a notice to the voter 08 under (a)(4) of this section. 09 (j) A voter making a statement under (a)(4)(D) of this section shall provide the 10 voter's current residence address in the sworn statement required under (a)(4) of this 11 section. 12 (k) In addition to a notice or response required under this section, at any time 13 the division may contact a voter to obtain or a voter may contact the division to 14 provide information to determine the voter's residence. 15 * Sec. 10. AS 15.07 is amended by adding a new section to read: 16 Sec. 15.07.133. Process to cancel registration. The director shall develop a 17 process to allow a voter to cancel the voter's registration electronically or in person 18 before an election official. The process must include a requirement that the voter 19 verify the voter's identity before the registration may be cancelled. The director shall 20 prominently display instructions for a voter to cancel the voter's registration at each 21 polling place. 22 * Sec. 11. AS 15.07.195 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 23 (e) The director shall publish on the division's Internet website notice of the 24 nature and severity of a data breach of information made confidential by this section 25 and report the details of the breach to the president of the senate and the speaker of the 26 house of representatives 27 (1) before the day of an election, if the data breach happens or is 28 discovered within 14 days before an election; or 29 (2) before certifying the results of an election, if the data breach 30 happens or is discovered on or after the day of the election but before certification of 31 the election. 01 * Sec. 12. AS 15.10.105 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 02 (c) The director shall employ a rural community liaison. The rural community 03 liaison shall collaborate with tribes and municipalities to facilitate access to early and 04 absentee voting in rural areas of the state and ensure that precincts in rural areas of the 05 state are fully staffed. 06 * Sec. 13. AS 15.10.170(a) is amended to read: 07 (a) The precinct party committee, where an organized precinct committee 08 exists, or the party district committee where no organized precinct committee exists, 09 or the state party chairperson where neither a precinct nor a party district committee 10 exists, may appoint one or more [PERSONS AS] watchers in each precinct and 11 counting center for any election. A [EACH] candidate may appoint one or more 12 watchers for each precinct or counting center in the candidate's respective district or 13 the state for any election. An [ANY] organization or organized group that sponsors or 14 opposes a ballot proposition [AN INITIATIVE, REFERENDUM,] or question 15 [RECALL] may have one or more [PERSONS AS] watchers at the polls and counting 16 centers after first obtaining authorization from the director. A candidate, or an 17 organization or organized group with authorization from the director, may 18 appoint at least one watcher for each location where ballots or envelopes are 19 reviewed or counted in a precinct or counting center. A state party chairperson, a 20 precinct party committee, a party district committee, or a candidate may not have more 21 than one watcher on duty at a time in any precinct or counting center. A watcher must 22 be a United States citizen. The watcher may be present at a position inside the place of 23 voting or counting that affords a full view of all action of the election officials taken 24 from the time the polls are opened until the ballots are finally counted and the results 25 certified by the election board or the data processing review board. The election board 26 or the data processing review board may require each watcher to present written proof 27 showing appointment by the precinct party committee, the party district committee, 28 the organization or organized group, or the candidate the watcher represents and that 29 is signed by the respective chairperson or chairperson's designee of the precinct 30 party committee or party district committee, the state party chairperson, the 31 organization or organized group, or the candidate or candidate's designee. 01 * Sec. 14. AS 15.13.020(j) is amended to read: 02 (j) The commission shall establish offices [AN OFFICE, WHICH MAY BE 03 CALLED A REGIONAL OFFICE, IN EACH SENATE DISTRICT IN THE STATE 04 TO KEEP ON FILE FOR PUBLIC INSPECTION COPIES OF ALL REPORTS 05 FILED WITH THE COMMISSION BY CANDIDATES FOR STATEWIDE OFFICE 06 AND BY CANDIDATES FOR LEGISLATIVE OFFICE IN THAT DISTRICT; 07 HOWEVER, WHERE ONE MUNICIPALITY CONTAINS MORE THAN ONE 08 HOUSE DISTRICT, ONLY ONE COMMISSION OFFICE SHALL BE 09 ESTABLISHED IN THAT MUNICIPALITY. THE REGIONAL OFFICE SHALL 10 MAKE ALL FORMS AND PERTINENT MATERIAL AVAILABLE TO 11 CANDIDATES. ALL REPORTS SHALL BE FILED BY CANDIDATES, GROUPS, 12 AND INDIVIDUALS DIRECTLY WITH THE COMMISSION'S CENTRAL 13 DISTRICT OFFICE. THE COMMISSION SHALL ENSURE THAT COPIES OF 14 ALL REPORTS BY STATEWIDE AND LEGISLATIVE CANDIDATES IN EACH 15 SENATE DISTRICT ARE FORWARDED PROMPTLY TO THAT DISTRICT OR 16 REGIONAL OFFICE]. 17 * Sec. 15. AS 15.13.400(19) is amended to read: 18 (19) "true source" means, 19 (A) for a contribution made for the purpose of influencing a 20 ballot proposition or question, the person or legal entity that makes the 21 contribution or independent expenditure to support or oppose the 22 proposition or question; or 23 (B) for a contribution made for the purpose of influencing 24 the nomination or election of a candidate, 25 (i) the person or legal entity whose contribution is 26 funded from wages, investment income, inheritance, or revenue 27 generated from selling goods or services; 28 (ii) a person or legal entity who derives [DERIVED] 29 funds via contributions, donations, dues, or gifts is not the true source 30 [,] but is [RATHER] an intermediary for the true source except that, 31 for a contribution from [; NOTWITHSTANDING THE 01 FOREGOING, TO THE EXTENT] a membership organization that 02 receives dues or contributions of less than $2,000 per person per year, 03 the organization itself is [SHALL BE CONSIDERED] the true source. 04 * Sec. 16. AS 15.15.060(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) Immediately following the appointment of the election board, the election 06 supervisor in conjunction with the election board chair shall secure polling places for 07 holding the election, suitable ballot boxes that will ensure [ASSURE] security, and an 08 adequate number of voting booths or screens, national flags, pens, and pencils. At 09 every polling place, at least one voting booth shall be furnished and not less than one 10 voting booth or screen shall be furnished for each 100 votes or fractional part of 100 11 votes cast in the previous election. [AT EVERY POLLING PLACE, AT LEAST 12 ONE-HALF OF THE VOTING BOOTHS USED SHALL BE NOT LESS THAN SIX 13 FEET IN HEIGHT, ENCLOSED ON THREE SIDES, AND PROVIDED WITH A 14 CURTAIN EXTENDING FROM THE TOP OF THE VOTING BOOTH TO 15 WITHIN APPROXIMATELY 30 INCHES OF THE FLOOR. THE CURTAIN OF 16 THE VOTING BOOTH MUST CONCEAL THE VOTER WHILE VOTING.] The 17 election supervisor and the election board chair may, in an emergency, secure an 18 alternate location for a polling place. 19 * Sec. 17. AS 15.15.060(b) is amended to read: 20 (b) To ensure [ASSURE] administrative economy and to protect the secrecy 21 of the ballot, the director may adopt regulations prescribing 22 (1) the type of polling place for holding the election; 23 (2) the requirements regarding ballot boxes, voting screens, national 24 flags, and other supplies; and 25 (3) [SUBJECT TO THE SPECIFICATIONS OF (a) OF THIS 26 SECTION,] the requirements regarding voting booths. 27 * Sec. 18. AS 15.15.060 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 28 (f) To the extent practicable, the division shall provide language assistance 29 required under 52 U.S.C. 10503, as amended, at each polling place. An election 30 supervisor shall post at each polling place information regarding the availability of 31 language assistance in English and all other languages for which language assistance 01 is required to be provided in the jurisdiction under federal law. 02 * Sec. 19. AS 15.15.225(a) is amended to read: 03 (a) Before being allowed to vote, each voter shall exhibit to an election official 04 one form of identification, including 05 (1) an official voter registration card, driver's license, state 06 identification card, current and valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or 07 identification card issued by a federally recognized tribe [HUNTING OR 08 FISHING LICENSE]; or 09 (2) an original or a copy of a [CURRENT] utility bill, bank statement, 10 paycheck, government check, or other government document; an item exhibited under 11 this paragraph must show the name and current address of the voter and must be 12 dated within the previous 60 days. 13 * Sec. 20. AS 15.15.370 is amended to read: 14 Sec. 15.15.370. Results [COMPLETION] of ballot count [; 15 CERTIFICATE]. When the count of ballots is completed, and in no event later than 16 the day after the election, the election board shall make a certificate in duplicate of the 17 results. The certificate includes the number of votes cast for each candidate, including, 18 for a candidate in a general election, the number of votes at each ranking [ROUND 19 OF THE RANKED-CHOICE TABULATION PROCESS] under AS 15.15.350, the 20 number of votes for and against each proposition, yes or no on each question, and any 21 additional information prescribed by the director. However, a precinct that counts 22 results exclusively by hand may report the number of votes cast for each highest- 23 ranked candidate and need not report the number of second-place or lower 24 ranked votes cast for a candidate. The election board shall, immediately upon 25 completion of the certificate or as soon thereafter as the local mail service permits, 26 send in one sealed package to the director one copy of the certificate and the register. 27 In addition, all ballots properly cast shall be mailed to the director in a separate, sealed 28 package. Both packages, in addition to an address on the outside, shall clearly indicate 29 the precinct from which they come. Each board shall, immediately upon completion of 30 the certification and as soon thereafter as the local mail service permits, send the 31 duplicate certificate to the respective election supervisor. The director may authorize 01 election boards in precincts in those areas of the state where distance and weather 02 make mail communication unreliable to forward their election results by telephone or 03 radio. The director may authorize the unofficial totaling of votes on a regional basis by 04 election supervisors, tallying the votes as indicated on duplicate certificates. To ensure 05 adequate protection, the director shall prescribe the manner in which the ballots, 06 registers, and all other election records and materials are thereafter preserved, 07 transferred, and destroyed. 08 * Sec. 21. AS 15.15.370 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 09 (b) Each day that the director releases unofficial totals of election results for a 10 general election, the director shall also 11 (1) release an updated ranked-choice tabulation; 12 (2) identify the precincts that have been counted; 13 (3) identify the days on which absentee ballots have been logged and 14 counted, including a summary of the count codes used on ballots in each district each 15 day; 16 (4) identify the districts in which early votes were cast and the days on 17 which votes were cast in each district; and 18 (5) identify the precincts and count codes of questioned ballots that 19 have been counted. 20 (c) Each day that an absentee ballot is reviewed under AS 15.20.201 or a 21 questioned ballot is reviewed under AS 15.20.207, the director shall display on the 22 division's Internet website an updated unofficial total detailing the number of absentee 23 ballots and questioned ballots counted for each count code. 24 (d) In this section, "count code" means a code assigned to a ballot by the 25 division that designates the races in which the ballot is to be counted during a district 26 absentee ballot counting review conducted under AS 15.20.203 or a district questioned 27 ballot review conducted under AS 15.20.207. 28 * Sec. 22. AS 15.15.380 is amended to read: 29 Sec. 15.15.380. Payment of election board members. The director shall pay 30 each election board member for time spent at election duties, including the receiving 31 of instructions. Election board chairpersons and the chairperson and members of the 01 absentee ballot, questioned ballot, and state ballot counting review boards shall be 02 paid for time spent at their election duties. The director shall set the compensation to 03 be paid under this section [BY REGULATION]. 04 * Sec. 23. AS 15.15.420 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 15.15.420. Duty to review the ballot counting. The director shall review 06 the counting of the ballots [WITH THE ASSISTANCE OF AND] in the presence of 07 the appointed representatives from the political parties. A candidate for an office that 08 is on the ballots being counted and appointed representatives from the group 09 supporting and from the group opposing a ballot proposition or question may be 10 present and observe the counting of the ballots. 11 * Sec. 24. AS 15.15.430(a) is amended to read: 12 (a) The review of ballot counting by the director must [SHALL] include 13 [ONLY (1)] a review of the precinct registers, tallies, and ballots cast. The review 14 must include [; (2)] a review of absentee and questioned ballots as prescribed by law. 15 The review must include, for each house district except a house district where all 16 races on the ballot are uncontested [; AND (3) UNLESS THE BALLOT FOR THE 17 HOUSE DISTRICT CONTAINS NOTHING BUT UNCONTESTED OFFICES], a 18 hand count of ballots from one randomly selected precinct in the [EACH] house 19 district that accounts for at least five percent of the ballots cast in that district. The 20 director shall adopt regulations prescribing additional review procedures 21 employing statistical methods to limit the risk of certifying an election result that 22 would be inconsistent with the result that would be obtained by conducting a 23 recount. 24 * Sec. 25. AS 15.20.030 is amended to read: 25 Sec. 15.20.030. Preparation of ballots, envelopes, and other material. The 26 director shall provide ballots for use as absentee ballots in all districts. The director 27 shall provide a secrecy sleeve in which the voter shall initially place the marked ballot 28 [,] and shall provide a postage-paid return [AN] envelope with the prescribed voter's 29 certificate on it, in which the secrecy sleeve with ballot enclosed shall be placed. The 30 director shall prescribe the form of and prepare the voter's certificate, envelopes, and 31 other material used in absentee voting. The voter's certificate shall include a 01 declaration, for use when required, that the voter is a qualified voter in all respects, a 02 blank for the voter's signature, and a space for recording the date that the voter 03 executed the certificate. An envelope may not identify a voter's party affiliation [, 04 A CERTIFICATION THAT THE AFFIANT PROPERLY EXECUTED THE 05 MARKING OF THE BALLOT AND GAVE THE VOTER'S IDENTITY, BLANKS 06 FOR THE ATTESTING OFFICIAL OR WITNESS, AND A PLACE FOR 07 RECORDING THE DATE THE ENVELOPE WAS SEALED AND WITNESSED]. 08 The envelope with the voter's certificate must include a notice that false statements 09 made by the voter [OR BY THE ATTESTING OFFICIAL OR WITNESS] on the 10 certificate are punishable by law. 11 * Sec. 26. AS 15.20.072(c) is amended to read: 12 (c) A representative requesting a special needs ballot shall provide 13 current and valid photo identification card or an identification card issued by a 14 federally recognized tribe and sign a register provided by an election official. The 15 register must require that the representative provide the representative's printed 16 name, the name of the authority that issued the provided identification card, the 17 type of provided identification card, the number associated with the provided 18 identification card, the representative's phone number if available, the 19 representative's electronic mail address if available, the name of the voter who 20 requested the special needs ballot, and the dates on which the specials needs 21 ballot is provided to the representative and returned to the division. The election 22 official shall verify that the representative's name, and, if applicable, likeness, 23 match the provided identification card by signing or initialing the register. After 24 the election official signs or initials the register, the election official shall explain 25 to the representative the duties of a representative and a voter under (d) of this 26 section and give the representative an envelope that includes a printed record of 27 information required to be filled out by the representative. An election official 28 may not issue the special needs ballot until the representative has provided the 29 information required on the record. The record [IF THE REQUEST FOR A 30 SPECIAL NEEDS BALLOT IS MADE THROUGH A REPRESENTATIVE, THE 31 REPRESENTATIVE SHALL SIGN A REGISTER PROVIDED BY AN ELECTION 01 OFFICIAL. THE REGISTER] must include the following information: 02 (1) the representative's name; 03 (2) the representative's residence and mailing address; 04 (3) the representative's social security number, voter identification 05 number, or date of birth; 06 (4) the name of the voter on whose behalf the representative is 07 requesting a ballot and voting materials; 08 (5) an oath that the representative 09 (A) is receiving a ballot and voting materials on behalf of the 10 voter; 11 (B) will not vote the ballot for the voter; 12 (C) will not coerce the voter; 13 (D) will not divulge the vote cast by the voter; and 14 (E) has been notified that unlawful interference with voting is 15 punishable under AS 15.56.030; 16 (6) the representative's signature. 17 * Sec. 27. AS 15.20.072(d) is amended to read: 18 (d) The representative shall deliver the special needs ballot, envelope, secrecy 19 sleeve, and other voting materials provided by the division to the voter as soon as 20 practicable. The voter shall mark the ballot in secret, place the ballot in the secrecy 21 sleeve, and place the secrecy sleeve in the envelope [PROVIDED]. The voter shall 22 provide the information on the envelope that would be required for absentee voting if 23 the voter voted in person. The voter shall sign the voter's certificate in the presence of 24 the representative. The representative shall sign as attesting official and date the 25 voter's signature. 26 * Sec. 28. AS 15.20.072 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 27 (h) If a qualified voter satisfies the requirements of (d) of this section, the 28 division may not reject the voter's special needs ballot based on an error by an election 29 official or a representative. If the circumstances show evidence of unlawful 30 interference or misconduct, a special needs ballot may be held for further review. 31 (i) The director shall train each absentee voting official, election supervisor, 01 and member of a precinct election board on the requirements of this section. 02 * Sec. 29. AS 15.20.081(d) is amended to read: 03 (d) Upon receipt of an absentee ballot by mail, the voter [, IN THE 04 PRESENCE OF A NOTARY PUBLIC, COMMISSIONED OFFICER OF THE 05 ARMED FORCES INCLUDING THE NATIONAL GUARD, DISTRICT JUDGE 06 OR MAGISTRATE, UNITED STATES POSTAL OFFICIAL, REGISTRATION 07 OFFICIAL, OR OTHER PERSON QUALIFIED TO ADMINISTER OATHS,] may 08 proceed to mark the ballot in secret, to place the ballot in the secrecy sleeve, to place 09 the secrecy sleeve in the envelope provided, and to sign the voter's certificate on the 10 envelope. The [IN THE PRESENCE OF AN OFFICIAL LISTED IN THIS 11 SUBSECTION WHO SHALL SIGN AS ATTESTING OFFICIAL AND SHALL 12 DATE THE SIGNATURE. IF NONE OF THE OFFICIALS LISTED IN THIS 13 SUBSECTION IS REASONABLY ACCESSIBLE, AN ABSENTEE VOTER 14 SHALL SIGN THE VOTER'S CERTIFICATE IN THE PRESENCE OF AN 15 INDIVIDUAL WHO IS 18 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER, WHO SHALL SIGN AS 16 A WITNESS AND ATTEST TO THE DATE ON WHICH THE VOTER SIGNED 17 THE CERTIFICATE IN THE INDIVIDUAL'S PRESENCE, AND, IN ADDITION, 18 THE] voter shall certify, as prescribed in AS 09.63.020, under penalty of perjury, that 19 the statements in the voter's certification are true. 20 * Sec. 30. AS 15.20.081(e) is amended to read: 21 (e) An absentee ballot must be marked on or before the date of the election. 22 Except as provided in (h) of this section, a voter who returns the absentee ballot by 23 mail, whether provided to the voter by mail or by electronic transmission, shall use a 24 mail service at least equal to first class and mail the ballot not later than the day of the 25 election to the election supervisor for the house district in which the voter seeks to 26 vote. Except as provided in AS 15.20.480, the ballot may not be counted unless it is 27 received by the close of business on the 10th day after the election. [IF THE BALLOT 28 IS POSTMARKED, IT MUST BE POSTMARKED ON OR BEFORE ELECTION 29 DAY.] After the day of the election, ballots may not be accepted unless received by 30 mail. A ballot received after the day of the election that is not postmarked or is 31 postmarked after the day of the election may not be counted unless the ballot 01 envelope is marked with a United States Postal Service tracking barcode 02 sufficient to verify that the ballot was mailed on or before the day of the election 03 or with a division of elections ballot tracking barcode sufficient to verify that the 04 ballot was mailed on or before the day of the election. 05 * Sec. 31. AS 15.20.081(f) is amended to read: 06 (f) The director shall require a voter casting an absentee ballot by mail to 07 provide proof of identification or other information to aid in the establishment of the 08 voter's identity as prescribed by regulations adopted under AS 44.62 (Administrative 09 Procedure Act). If the voter is a first-time voter who initially registered by mail or by 10 facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director under 11 AS 15.07.050 and has not met the identification requirements set out in AS 15.07.060, 12 the voter must provide one of the following forms of proof of identification: 13 (1) a copy of a driver's license, state identification card, current and 14 valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or identification card issued by 15 a federally recognized tribe [HUNTING OR FISHING LICENSE]; or 16 (2) an original or a copy of a [CURRENT] utility bill, bank statement, 17 paycheck, government check, or other government document; an item provided under 18 this paragraph must show the name and current address of the voter and must be 19 dated within the previous 60 days. 20 * Sec. 32. AS 15.20.081(h) is amended to read: 21 (h) Except as provided in AS 15.20.480, an absentee ballot returned by mail 22 from outside the United States or from an overseas voter qualifying under 23 AS 15.05.011 that has been marked and mailed not later than election day may not be 24 counted unless the ballot is received by the election supervisor not later than the close 25 of business on the 26 [(1)] 10th day following the [A PRIMARY] election [OR SPECIAL 27 PRIMARY ELECTION UNDER AS 15.40.140; OR 28 (2) 15TH DAY FOLLOWING A GENERAL ELECTION OR 29 SPECIAL ELECTION, OTHER THAN A SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION 30 DESCRIBED IN (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION]. 31 * Sec. 33. AS 15.20.081 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 01 (m) An absentee ballot application must include an option for a qualified voter 02 to choose to receive absentee ballots by mail for future regularly scheduled state 03 elections. The division may not require a voter who chooses this option to reapply for 04 an absentee ballot by mail unless 05 (1) the voter has not voted an absentee ballot for a period of four years; 06 or 07 (2) the voter's previous absentee ballot sent under this section was 08 returned to the division as undeliverable. 09 * Sec. 34. AS 15.20.170 is amended to read: 10 Sec. 15.20.170. Disposition of ballots. Each absentee voting official shall 11 transmit the dated envelopes containing the marked ballots by the most expeditious 12 mail service to the election supervisor for the district. Upon receipt of the absentee 13 ballots, the election supervisor shall stamp on the envelope the date on which the 14 ballot is received. In this section, "mail service" includes delivery by optical 15 scanning and electronic transmission. 16 * Sec. 35. AS 15.20.201(a) is amended to read: 17 (a) Not [NO] less than 12 [SEVEN] days preceding the day of election, the 18 election supervisor, in the presence and with the assistance of the district absentee 19 ballot counting board, shall review all voter certificates of absentee ballots received by 20 that date. The review of absentee ballots shall continue at times designated by the 21 election supervisor until completed. 22 * Sec. 36. AS 15.20.203(b) is amended to read: 23 (b) An absentee ballot must be rejected [MAY NOT BE COUNTED] if 24 (1) the voter has failed to properly execute the certificate; 25 (2) [AN OFFICIAL OR THE WITNESSES AUTHORIZED BY LAW 26 TO ATTEST THE VOTER'S CERTIFICATE FAIL TO EXECUTE THE 27 CERTIFICATE, EXCEPT THAT AN ABSENTEE BALLOT CAST IN PERSON 28 AND ACCEPTED BY AN ABSENTEE VOTING OFFICIAL OR ELECTION 29 SUPERVISOR MAY BE COUNTED DESPITE FAILURE OF THE ABSENTEE 30 VOTING OFFICIAL OR ELECTION SUPERVISOR TO PROPERLY SIGN AND 31 DATE THE VOTER'S CERTIFICATE AS ATTESTING OFFICIAL AS REQUIRED 01 UNDER AS 15.20.061(c); 02 (3) THE BALLOT IS NOT ATTESTED ON OR BEFORE THE 03 DATE OF THE ELECTION; 04 (4)] the ballot envelope and certificate, if delivered by mail after the 05 day of the election [POSTMARKED], 06 (A) is not postmarked or is postmarked after [ON OR 07 BEFORE] the date of the election and is not marked with a United States 08 Postal Service tracking barcode sufficient to verify that the ballot was 09 mailed on or before the day of the election or with a division of elections 10 ballot tracking barcode sufficient to verify that the ballot was mailed on or 11 before the day of the election; 12 (B) has a United States Postal Service tracking barcode 13 verifying that the ballot was mailed after the date of the election or a 14 division of elections ballot tracking barcode verifying that the ballot was 15 mailed after the date of the election; or 16 (C) is executed after the date of the election; 17 (3) [(5)] after the day of election, the ballot was delivered by a means 18 other than mail; or 19 (4) [OR (6)] the voter voted 20 (A) in person and is a 21 (i) first-time voter who initially registered by mail or by 22 facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director 23 under AS 15.07.050, has not provided the identification required by 24 AS 15.15.225(a), was not eligible for waiver of the identification 25 requirement under AS 15.15.225(b), and has not provided the 26 identifiers required in AS 15.07.060(a)(2) and (3) that can be verified 27 through state agency records described in AS 15.07.055(e); or 28 (ii) voter other than one described in (i) of this 29 subparagraph, did not provide identification described in 30 AS 15.15.225(a), was not personally known by the election official, 31 and has not provided the identifiers required in AS 15.07.060(a)(2) and 01 (3); or 02 (B) by mail or electronic transmission, is a first-time voter who 03 initially registered by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission 04 approved by the director under AS 15.07.050 to vote, has not met the 05 identification requirements set out in AS 15.07.060, and does not submit with 06 the ballot a copy of a 07 (i) driver's license, state identification card, current and 08 valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or identification 09 card issued by a federally recognized tribe [HUNTING OR 10 FISHING LICENSE]; or 11 (ii) an original or a copy of a [CURRENT] utility bill, 12 bank statement, paycheck, government check, or other government 13 document; an item described in this sub-subparagraph must show the 14 name and current address of the voter and must be dated within the 15 previous 60 days. 16 * Sec. 37. AS 15.20 is amended by adding a new section to read: 17 Sec. 15.20.215. Rules for challenging ballot. The director shall adopt by 18 regulation a procedure and time frame for a person present at the ballot counting 19 review to challenge the decision of whether to count an absentee, special needs, or 20 questioned ballot. The procedure must provide a reasonable amount of time to submit 21 a challenge. 22 * Sec. 38. AS 15.20.220(b) is amended to read: 23 (b) The state review board shall review and count absentee ballots under 24 AS 15.20.081(e) and (h), absentee ballots properly cured under AS 15.20.222, and 25 questioned ballots that have been forwarded to the director and that have not been 26 reviewed or counted by a district counting board. 27 * Sec. 39. AS 15.20 is amended by adding new sections to read: 28 Sec. 15.20.221. Ballot-tracking system. (a) The director shall establish an 29 online ballot-tracking system. If the director procures the system from a third party, 30 the third party must be a corporation that is incorporated in the United States. The 31 system must be designed to allow a voter to easily use the system through a mobile 01 electronic device. The system must allow a voter to 02 (1) confirm that the voter's ballot has been sent by the division; 03 (2) track the date of the ballot's delivery to the voter; 04 (3) confirm the division's receipt of the voter's ballot; 05 (4) determine whether the voter's ballot has been counted; and 06 (5) provide the information necessary to cure a rejected ballot. 07 (b) The online ballot-tracking system must 08 (1) use multi-factor authentication to verify a voter's identity; and 09 (2) indicate to a voter 10 (A) the process by which the voter may cure the lack of 11 signature or verify the voter's identity, if the signature on the voter's ballot was 12 missing; and 13 (B) the reason the voter's ballot was not counted, if the ballot 14 was not counted. 15 (c) The division may not charge a voter a fee to use the online ballot-tracking 16 system. 17 Sec. 15.20.222. Procedure for curing uncounted ballot. (a) If a voter's ballot 18 is rejected because the certificate is missing a signature or the voter provided 19 insufficient voter identification, the director shall immediately make a reasonable 20 effort to contact the voter, explain the ballot deficiency, explain how the deficiency 21 may be cured, and inform the voter of the deadline to cure the ballot. The director 22 shall, within 24 hours, send a notice of deficiency by electronic mail to the voter's 23 electronic mail address if the voter has provided an electronic mail address. If the 24 voter has provided a telephone number, the director shall, within 24 hours, attempt to 25 notify the voter of the deficiency by telephone call and text message. The director 26 shall, within 48 hours, but not later than five days after election day, send a notice of 27 deficiency by first class, nonforwardable mail to the address in the voter's registration 28 record. 29 (b) A notice of deficiency must include a form for the voter to confirm that the 30 voter returned a ballot to the division, provide a copy of a form of identification 31 accepted by the division under AS 15.15.225(a), and provide a signature. The director 01 shall provide a printed copy of the form with the notice of deficiency mailed to the 02 voter. The director shall also make the form available in a format that can be 03 completed and returned electronically. 04 (c) The rejected ballot of a voter who received a notice of deficiency may be 05 counted only if 06 (1) the voter returns the completed form sent with the notice of 07 deficiency, the division receives the form within 10 days after election day, and the 08 form confirms that the voter returned a ballot to the division; 09 (2) the voter provides a signature and includes a copy of a form of 10 identification accepted by the division under AS 15.15.225(a); and 11 (3) the ballot is otherwise valid. 12 (d) A voter's rejected ballot may not be counted and the director shall, if 13 applicable, send copies of the signature on the voter's return envelope to the attorney 14 general for investigation if the voter returns the form and the form indicates that the 15 voter did not return a ballot to the division. 16 * Sec. 40. AS 15.20.480 is amended to read: 17 Sec. 15.20.480. Procedure for recount. In conducting the recount, the director 18 shall review all ballots, whether the ballots were counted at the precinct or by 19 computer or by the district absentee counting board or the questioned ballot counting 20 board, to determine which ballots, or part of ballots, were properly marked and which 21 ballots are to be counted in the recount, and shall check the accuracy of the original 22 count, the precinct certificate, and the review. [THE DIRECTOR SHALL COUNT 23 ABSENTEE BALLOTS RECEIVED BEFORE THE COMPLETION OF THE 24 RECOUNT.] For administrative purposes, the director may join and include two or 25 more applications in a single review and count of votes. The rules in AS 15.15.360 26 governing the counting of ballots shall be followed in the recount when a ballot is 27 challenged on the basis of a question regarding the voter's intent to vote for the 28 candidate, proposition, or question. The ballots and other election material must 29 remain in the custody of the director during the recount, and the highest degree of care 30 shall be exercised to protect the ballots against alteration or mutilation. The recount 31 shall be completed within 10 days. The director may employ additional personnel 01 necessary to assist in the recount. 02 * Sec. 41. AS 15.20 is amended by adding a new section to read: 03 Article 4A. Ballot Drop Boxes. 04 Sec. 15.20.850. Ballot drop boxes. The director shall provide secure ballot 05 drop boxes. The director shall adopt regulations governing the use and location of 06 ballot drop boxes. The director shall provide a drop box at each division regional 07 office. When selecting drop box locations, the director may consult with 08 municipalities, school districts, tribal organizations, and nonpartisan civic 09 organizations. The director shall include in the regulations the criteria for selecting the 10 locations of drop boxes, the security requirements for the drop boxes, and a 11 requirement that drop boxes be open 24 hours a day in the 10 days before an election 12 day. The regulations must require that each drop box be open on the election day until 13 8:00 p.m. A municipality may provide a drop box under regulations adopted by the 14 director. 15 * Sec. 42. AS 15.56.030(d) is amended to read: 16 (d) For purposes of (a)(2) and (3) of this section, "other valuable thing" 17 (1) includes 18 (A) an entry in a game of chance in which a prize of money or 19 other present or future pecuniary gain or advantage may be awarded to a 20 participant wherein the total of the prizes offered is greater than $2 per 21 participant with a maximum of $100; and 22 (B) government employment or benefits; 23 (2) does not include 24 (A) materials having a nominal value bearing the name, 25 likeness, or other identification of a candidate, political party, political group, 26 party district committee, or organization, or stating a position on a ballot 27 proposition or question; 28 (B) food and refreshments provided incidental to an activity 29 that is nonpartisan in nature and directed at encouraging persons to vote, or 30 incidental to a gathering in support of or in opposition to a candidate, political 31 party, political group, party district committee, organization, or ballot question 01 or proposition; 02 (C) care of the voter's dependents provided in connection with 03 the absence of a voter from home for the purpose of voting; 04 (D) services provided by a person acting as a representative 05 under AS 15.20.072; 06 (E) services provided by an election official as defined in 07 AS 15.80.010; [AND] 08 (F) transportation of a voter to or from the polls without 09 charge; and 10 (G) postage-paid return envelopes required in 11 AS 15.20.030. 12 * Sec. 43. AS 15.56.060(a) is amended to read: 13 (a) A person commits the crime of unlawful interference with an election if 14 the person 15 (1) induces or attempts to induce an election official to fail in the 16 official's duty by force, threat, intimidation, or offers of reward; 17 (2) intentionally changes, attempts to change, or causes to be changed 18 an official election document including ballots, tallies, and returns; 19 (3) intentionally delays, attempts to delay, or causes to be delayed the 20 sending of the certificate, register, ballots, or other materials whether original or 21 duplicate, required to be sent by AS 15.15.370; [OR] 22 (4) is contracted or employed by the state to print or reproduce in any 23 manner an official ballot, and the person knowingly 24 (A) personally appropriates, or gives or delivers to, or permits 25 to be taken by anyone other than a person authorized by the director, official 26 ballots; or 27 (B) prints or reproduces or has printed or reproduced official 28 ballots in a form or with a content other than that prescribed by law or as 29 directed by the director; 30 (5) intentionally opens or tampers with a signed absentee ballot 31 certificate, sealed absentee ballot envelope, or package of ballots without express 01 authorization from the director; or 02 (6) intentionally breaches, hacks, alters, or tampers with election 03 machinery, including a tabulator, a program, a system, a server, or software used 04 to verify identity, count or tabulate, or manage or control an election function. 05 * Sec. 44. AS 15.56.070(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) A person commits the crime of election official misconduct in the first 07 degree if, while an election official, the person 08 (1) intentionally fails to perform an election duty or knowingly does an 09 unauthorized act with the intent to affect an election or its results; 10 (2) knowingly permits or makes or attempts to make a false count of 11 election returns; [OR] 12 (3) intentionally conceals, withholds, destroys, or attempts to conceal, 13 withhold, or destroy election returns; or 14 (4) knowingly discloses, shares, or reports to a person who is not 15 an election official election results, returns, or any confidential election data 16 before the polls close on election day. 17 * Sec. 45. AS 15.80 is amended by adding a new section to read: 18 Sec. 15.80.006. Cybersecurity. The lieutenant governor shall, by regulation, 19 develop a cybersecurity program to defend the voter registration records kept by the 20 division against cyber attacks and data breaches and enable the division to detect and 21 recover from cyber attacks. The program must include cybersecurity training for 22 election officials. 23 * Sec. 46. AS 15.80 is amended by adding a new section to read: 24 Sec. 15.80.009. Synthetic media in electioneering communications. (a) A 25 person may not knowingly use synthetic media in an electioneering communication 26 with the intent to influence an election. 27 (b) An individual who is harmed by an electioneering communication that 28 violates this section may bring an action in the superior court to recover damages, full 29 reasonable attorney fees, and costs from 30 (1) the person who created the electioneering communication or 31 retained the services of another to create the electioneering communication; 01 (2) a person who disseminates an electioneering communication 02 knowing that the electioneering communication includes synthetic media; or 03 (3) a person who removes a disclosure statement described in (d) of 04 this section from an electioneering communication with the intent to influence an 05 election and knowing that the electioneering communication includes synthetic media. 06 (c) An individual who is harmed by an electioneering communication that 07 violates this section may seek injunctive relief in the superior court to prohibit 08 publication of the synthetic media. 09 (d) It is a defense to an action under this section that 10 (1) the electioneering communication included the following 11 disclosure statement: "This (image/video/audio) has been manipulated" and 12 (A) for visual media that included other text, the text of the 13 disclosure statement remained visible throughout the entirety of the 14 communication, was easily readable by the average viewer, and was in a font 15 not smaller than the largest font size of any other text that appeared in the 16 visual component; 17 (B) for visual media that did not include any other text, the 18 disclosure statement was in a font size that was easily readable by the average 19 viewer; 20 (C) for a communication that consisted of only audio, the 21 disclosure statement was read 22 (i) at the beginning of the audio, at the end of the audio, 23 and, if the audio was longer than two minutes in duration, at intervals 24 interspersed within the audio that occurred at least once every two 25 minutes; and 26 (ii) in a clear manner and in a pitch and at a speed that 27 was easily heard by the average listener; or 28 (2) the synthetic media constitutes satire or parody. 29 (e) An interactive computer service, Internet service provider, cloud service 30 provider, telecommunications network, or radio or television broadcaster, including a 31 cable or satellite television operator, programmer, or producer, is not liable under this 01 section for hosting, publishing, or distributing an electioneering communication 02 provided by another person. For purposes of this section, a developer of the 03 technology used to create synthetic media that is in an electioneering communication 04 is not the creator of the electioneering communication. This subsection does not 05 prevent an individual from bringing an action under (b)(3) of this section for removing 06 a disclosure statement. 07 (f) In this section, 08 (1) "access software provider" means a provider of client, server, or 09 other software or enabling tools that 10 (A) filter, screen, allow, or disallow content; 11 (B) pick, choose, analyze, or digest content; or 12 (C) transmit, receive, display, forward, cache, search, subset, 13 organize, reorganize, or translate content; 14 (2) "artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that, for 15 explicit or implicit objectives, infers, from the input the system receives, how to 16 generate outputs, including predictions, content, recommendations, and decisions that 17 can influence physical or virtual environments, with different artificial intelligence 18 systems varying in levels of autonomy and adaptiveness after deployment; 19 (3) "electioneering communication" means a communication that 20 (A) directly or indirectly identifies a candidate or political 21 party; 22 (B) is disseminated through a mailing, a newspaper, the 23 Internet, or broadcast media, including radio, television, cable, or satellite, to 24 an audience that includes voters who will have the opportunity to vote on a 25 candidate identified in the communication or on a candidate of a party 26 identified in the communication; and 27 (C) when read as a whole and with limited reference to outside 28 events, is susceptible of no other reasonable interpretation but as an 29 exhortation to vote for or against a specific candidate; 30 (4) "interactive computer service" means an information service, 31 system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by 01 multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a service or system that 02 provides access to the Internet and systems operated or services offered by libraries or 03 educational institutions; 04 (5) "synthetic media" 05 (A) means an image, audio recording, or video recording of an 06 individual's appearance, speech, or conduct that is manipulated by artificial 07 intelligence in a manner that creates a realistic but false image, audio 08 recording, or video recording and produces 09 (i) a depiction that a reasonable person would believe is 10 of a real individual in appearance, speech, or conduct but did not 11 actually occur in reality; and 12 (ii) a materially different understanding or impression 13 than a reasonable person would have from the unaltered, original 14 version of the image, audio recording, or video recording; 15 (B) does not include an image, audio recording, or video 16 recording that is minimally edited, adjusted, or enhanced by artificial 17 intelligence without materially altering how the meaning or significance of the 18 depiction would be perceived by a reasonable person. 19 * Sec. 47. AS 19.25.105(a) is amended to read: 20 (a) Outdoor advertising may not be erected or maintained within 660 feet of 21 the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main-traveled way of the 22 interstate, primary, or secondary highways in this state except the following: 23 (1) directional and other official signs and notices that [WHICH] 24 include [, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO,] signs and notices pertaining to natural 25 wonders, scenic and historic attractions, which are required or authorized by law, and 26 which shall conform to federal standards for interstate and primary systems; 27 (2) signs, displays, and devices advertising the sale or lease of property 28 on [UPON] which they are located or advertising activities conducted on the property; 29 (3) signs determined by the state, subject to concurrence of the United 30 States Department of Transportation, to be landmark signs, including signs on farm 31 structures or natural surfaces of historic or artistic significance, the preservation of 01 which would be consistent with the provisions of this chapter; 02 (4) directional signs and notices pertaining to schools; 03 (5) advertising on bus benches or bus shelters, and adjacent trash 04 receptacles, if the state determines that the advertising conforms to local, state, and 05 federal standards for interstate and primary highways; 06 (6) temporary political campaign signs not larger than 32 square 07 feet in size displayed on private property if the owner or resident of the property 08 is not being compensated for the display, the sign is not a risk to the public, and 09 the sign is outside of an interstate, primary, or secondary highway right-of-way. 10 * Sec. 48. AS 24.45.091 is amended to read: 11 Sec. 24.45.091. Publication of reports. Copies of the statements and reports 12 filed under this chapter shall be made available to the public at the commission's 13 offices and on the commission's Internet website [CENTRAL OFFICE, THE 14 OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR, THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE 15 LIBRARY OF THE LEGISLATIVE AFFAIRS AGENCY, AND AT THE 16 COMMISSION'S DISTRICT OFFICES PRESCRIBED IN AS 15.13.020(j)] as soon 17 as practicable after each reporting period. 18 * Sec. 49. AS 24.45.111(b) is amended to read: 19 (b) The commission shall preserve the statements and reports required to be 20 filed under this chapter for a period of six years from the date of filing. Copies [IF 21 THE COMMISSION'S CENTRAL OFFICE IS NOT IN THE STATE CAPITAL, 22 COPIES] of all statements and reports filed under this chapter shall be maintained in 23 the commission's offices and be made available on the commission's Internet 24 website [AN OFFICE ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION IN THE STATE 25 CAPITAL OR IN THE OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR]. 26 * Sec. 50. AS 39.50.200(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 27 (65) Redistricting Board. 28 * Sec. 51. AS 43.23.015(b) is amended to read: 29 (b) The department shall prescribe and furnish an application form for 30 claiming a permanent fund dividend. The application must include 31 (1) notice of the penalties provided for under AS 43.23.270; 01 (2) a statement of eligibility and a certification of residency; 02 (3) the means for an applicant eligible to vote under AS 15.05, or a 03 person authorized to act on behalf of the applicant, to furnish information required by 04 AS 15.07.060(a)(1) - (4) and (7) - (9), and an attestation that such information is true, 05 as well as a prominent notice informing the applicant that the applicant may 06 decline to register to vote or update the applicant's voter information. 07 * Sec. 52. AS 43.23.015 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 08 (k) When an applicant applies for a permanent fund dividend on an Internet 09 website, the department shall inform the applicant that the applicant may decline to 10 register to vote or update the applicant's voter information. The Internet webpage 11 displaying the information required under this subsection must allow the applicant to 12 decline to register to vote or update the applicant's voter information. 13 * Sec. 53. AS 43.23.101 is amended to read: 14 Sec. 43.23.101. Voter registration. Each month, the [THE] commissioner 15 shall [ESTABLISH BY RULE A SCHEDULE BY WHICH THE COMMISSIONER 16 WILL PROVIDE, AND SHALL] provide [AS SOON AS IS PRACTICABLE] the 17 director of elections with the following information for each permanent fund 18 dividend applicant: 19 (1) the electronic record [RECORDS FROM THE PERMANENT 20 FUND DIVIDEND APPLICATIONS] of the information required by 21 AS 15.07.060(a)(1) - (4) and (7) - (9) [,] and the attestation that the [SUCH] 22 information is true [,] for each permanent fund dividend applicant who does not 23 decline to register to vote or update the applicant's voter information under 24 AS 43.23.015(b)(3) or (k); 25 [(A) IS A CITIZEN OF THE UNITED STATES; AND 26 (B) IS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OF AGE OR WILL BE 27 WITHIN 90 DAYS OF THE DATE OF THE APPLICATION; AND] 28 (2) the applicant's mailing address; 29 (3) the applicant's affirmation of residency and the names and 30 contact information of persons the applicant listed for purposes of verifying 31 residency; 01 (4) indication of the applicant's voter registration status, if known; 02 and 03 (5) whether the applicant has claimed residency in another state 04 [ADDRESSES FOR ALL PERMANENT FUND DIVIDEND APPLICANTS]. 05 * Sec. 54. AS 43.23.101 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 06 (b) The commissioner shall develop security protocols that ensure data 07 required to be stored or transferred under this section is securely stored or transferred. 08 (c) In cooperation with the division of elections under AS 15.07.070(o), the 09 commissioner shall submit an annual report to the governor and to the senate secretary 10 and chief clerk of the house of representatives on or before the first day of each 11 regular session of the legislature and notify the legislature that the report is available. 12 * Sec. 55. AS 44.62.310(h)(3) is amended to read: 13 (3) "public entity" means an entity of the state or of a political 14 subdivision of the state including an agency, a board or commission, the 15 Redistricting Board, the University of Alaska, a public authority or corporation, a 16 municipality, a school district, and other governmental units of the state or a political 17 subdivision of the state; it does not include the court system or the legislative branch 18 of state government. 19 * Sec. 56. AS 15.07.064(g) and AS 15.10.170(b) are repealed 20 * Sec. 57. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 21 read: 22 REPORT TO THE LEGISLATURE. The division of elections shall provide a report 23 to the legislature by November 1, 2026, recommending options for expanding early voting in 24 rural communities and low-income neighborhoods. The division shall deliver the report to the 25 senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature 26 that the report is available. In this section, 27 (1) "low-income neighborhood" means a neighborhood where the median 28 family income is below 80 percent of the statewide median family income; 29 (2) "rural community" means a community with a population of 7,500 or less 30 that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks or a community with a 31 population of 3,500 or less that is connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks. 01 * Sec. 58. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 02 read: 03 APPLICABILITY. AS 15.56.030(d), as amended by sec. 41 of this Act, 04 AS 15.56.060(a), as amended by sec. 43 of this Act, and AS 15.56.070(a), as amended by sec. 05 44 of this Act, apply to offenses committed on or after the effective date of this Act. 06 * Sec. 59. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.